Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202530-2602.02
Guardian or conservator; national criminal history record information check; report; waiver by court; costs.

(1) A person, except for a financial institution as that term is defined in section 8-101.03 or its officers, directors, employees, or agents or a trust company, who has been nominated for appointment as a guardian or conservator shall authorize the Nebraska State Patrol to submit the fingerprints of such applicants to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and to issue a report to the State Court Administrator that includes the criminal history record information concerning the applicant. The Nebraska State Patrol shall forward submitted fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record information check. The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the State Court Administrator that includes the criminal history record information concerning the applicant and file such report with the court at least ten days prior to the appointment hearing date, unless waived or modified by the court (a) for good cause shown by affidavit filed simultaneously with the petition for appointment or (b) in the event the protected person requests an expedited hearing under section 30-2630.01. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of the fingerprinting and criminal background check.

(2) An order appointing a guardian or conservator shall not be signed by the judge until such report has been filed with the court and reviewed by the judge. Such report, or the lack thereof, shall be certified either by affidavit or by obtaining a certified copy of the report. No report or national criminal history record check shall be required by the court upon the application of a petitioner for an emergency temporary guardianship or emergency temporary conservatorship. The court may waive the requirements of this section for good cause shown.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 34;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 151;

Laws 2025, LB453, § 1.